New Jersey, session 221, A3163.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2015, c.218 (C.39:4-207.10) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  (1)  A person who is a disabled veteran or a recipient of the Purple Heart is exempt from the payment of municipal parking meter fees when a motor vehicle owned by the disabled veteran or the Purple Heart recipient displays disabled veteran's or Purple Heart license plates or a placard issued by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission pursuant to the provisions of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes, unless the vehicle has been parked in one location for more than 24 hours.  The exemption provided under this subsection shall apply only when the disabled veteran or recipient of the Purple Heart to whom the special license plates or placards have been issued is either the driver, or a passenger, of the vehicle. (2)   The governing body of each municipality shall designate a parking space at or near the municipality's city hall or other principal municipal building for the exclusive use of a motor vehicle owned by and transporting a disabled veteran or Purple Heart recipient, which vehicle displays a disabled veteran's or Purple Heart license plate or a placard issued by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission pursuant to the provisions of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes. b.    The Chief Administrator of the Motor Vehicle Commission shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of subsection a. of this section, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), and shall include provisions for the issuance of disabled veteran's or Purple Heart recipient's placards. (cf: P.L.2015, c.218, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately but shall be inoperative until the first day of the sixth month following the date of enactment.